Louisiana, session 2026, HB596.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 30:4(C)(1)(a)(vi) and 21(D) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§4. Jurisdiction, duties, and powers of the secretary; rules and regulations
* * *
C. The secretary has authority to make, after notice and hearings as provided
in this Chapter, any reasonable rules, regulations, and orders that are necessary from
time to time in the proper administration and enforcement of this Chapter, including
rules, regulations, or orders for the following purposes:
(1)
* * *
(a)
* * *
(vi) To allow for a reduction of inactive well fee assessments for an operator
that plugs wells ten years old or older, consistent with this Item and R.S. 30:21.
* * *
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-517 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 596
§21. Fees and charges of the secretary; revisions; exceptions; collections; Oil and
Gas Regulatory Dedicated Fund Account; creation; amounts; requirements
* * *
D. A plugging credit shall be issued by the department pursuant to the
provisions of this Subsection to reduce an operator's inactive well assessment
obligations.
(1) Any well plugged by the operator which is ten years old or older is
eligible for the credit. Wells shall be plugged and abandoned and sites restored in
compliance with department rules and shall pass final inspection by the department
before a plugging credit may be issued.
(2) An operator who has plugged an eligible well shall apply to the
department, in a form prescribed by the department, for a reduction of the inactive
well assessment owed by the operator.
(3) Plugging credits shall be calculated at four dollars and fifty cents per foot
of each eligible well plugged and such credits shall be applied on a dollar-for-dollar
basis to reduce an operator's inactive well assessment.
* * *